Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 3

Transportation Network Companies

65-15-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Digital network” means any online-enabled application, software, web site, or system offered or utilized by a transportation network company that enables the prearrangement of rides with transportation network company drivers;

“Personal vehicle” means a vehicle that is used by a transportation network company driver and is:

Owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by the transportation network company driver; and

Not a taxicab, limousine, or for-hire vehicle;

“Prearranged ride” means the provision of transportation by a driver to a rider, beginning when a driver accepts a ride requested by a rider through a digital network controlled by a transportation network company, continuing while the driver transports a requesting rider, and ending when the last requesting rider departs from the personal vehicle. A prearranged ride does not include:

Shared expense carpool or vanpool arrangements provided by businesses engaged in the rental of motor vehicles; or

Transportation provided using a taxi, limousine, or other for-hire vehicle regulated pursuant to § 7-51-1003;

“Transportation network company” means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other entity operating in this state that uses a digital network to connect transportation network company riders to transportation network company drivers who provide prearranged rides. A transportation network company shall not be deemed to control, direct, or manage the personal vehicles or transportation network company drivers that connect to its digital network, except where agreed to by written contract;

“Transportation network company driver” or “driver” means an individual who:

Receives connections to potential passengers and related services from a transportation network company in exchange for payment of a fee to the transportation network company; and

Uses a personal vehicle to offer or provide a prearranged ride to riders upon connection through a digital network controlled by a transportation network company in return for compensation or payment of a fee; and

“Transportation network company rider” or “rider” means a person or persons who use a transportation network company's digital network to connect with a transportation network driver who provides prearranged rides to the rider in the driver's personal vehicle between points chosen by the rider.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-302. Laws and regulations applicable to transportation network companies.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, transportation network companies are governed exclusively by this part.

A transportation network company shall not be deemed to own, control, operate, or manage the personal vehicles used by transportation network company drivers and is not deemed to control or manage transportation network company drivers.

A transportation network company is not subject to any regulations passed by a municipality or other governmental entity governing private passenger for-hire vehicles pursuant to § 7-51-1003 and is not subject to the authority of the department of safety to regulate passenger operations pursuant to part 1 or 2 of this chapter. A transportation network company driver is not a chauffeur as defined in § 55-50-102(7) and is not subject to the requirements relating to commercial driver licenses or commercial vehicles covered under title 55, chapter 50.

Commercial service airports shall have authority to adopt reasonable standards, regulations, procedures, and fees for conducting transportation network services on airport property to promote the safe and efficient use of limited airport resources.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-303. Agent for service.

A transportation network company shall maintain an agent for service of process in this state.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-304. Duties of transportation network company operating in state.

A transportation network company operating in this state shall:

Provide riders with any applicable rates charged for a prearranged ride and the option to receive an estimated fare before the rider enters the driver's motor vehicle;

Use a software application or web site to display a picture of the driver and the license plate number of the motor vehicle utilized for providing the prearranged ride before the rider enters the driver's motor vehicle;

Transmit an electronic receipt to the rider within a reasonable time after the completion of a prearranged ride that lists:

The origin and destination of the trip;

The total time and distance of the trip; and

An itemization of the total fare paid, if any;

Implement a zero-tolerance policy on the use of drugs or alcohol by a driver while a driver provides a prearranged ride or is logged into the transportation network company's digital network but is not providing a prearranged ride, and provide notice of this policy on its web site;

Maintain:

Individual trip records for each driver for at least two (2) years from the date each trip was provided by the driver; and

Driver records for no less than two (2) years from the date on which a driver's activation on the transportation network company's digital network has ended;

Conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background check on any potential driver that includes a multistate criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation;

Conduct a national sex offender registry search for any potential driver;

Obtain motor vehicle records for any potential driver;

Comply with § 55-12-141; and

Comply with § 56-7-1118(f).

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-305. Complaint handling procedures — Recordkeeping requirements.

A transportation network company operating in this state shall establish procedures to report any complaint about a driver with whom a rider was matched and whom the rider reasonably suspects was under the influence of drugs or alcohol during the course of the trip.

Upon receipt of a rider complaint alleging a violation of the zero-tolerance policy set out in § 65-15-304(4), the transportation network company shall immediately suspend the driver's access to the transportation network company's digital network, and shall conduct an investigation into the reported complaint. The suspension shall last the duration of the investigation.

The transportation network company shall maintain records relevant to a rider complaint made pursuant to this section for a period of at least two (2) years from the date that a complaint is received by the transportation network company.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-306. Individuals prohibited from acting as drivers.

A transportation network company operating in this state shall not permit any individual to act as a driver on its digital network who:

Has been convicted of more than three (3) moving violations in the prior three-year period, or one (1) major violation in the past three-year period, including, but not limited to, attempting to evade the police, reckless driving, or driving on a suspended or revoked license;

Has been convicted, within the past seven (7) years, of driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol, fraud, any sexual offense, use of a motor vehicle to commit a felony, a crime involving property damage, theft, any crime involving acts of violence, or acts of terror;

Is a match in the national sex offender registry;

Does not possess a valid driver license;

Does not possess proof of registration for any motor vehicle used to provide a prearranged ride;

Does not possess proof of personal automobile liability insurance that satisfies the requirements of title 55, chapter 12, for any motor vehicle used to provide a prearranged ride; or

Is not at least nineteen (19) years of age.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-307. Acceptance of street hails prohibited.

A driver shall not solicit or accept street hails.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-308. Cash payments prohibited.

The transportation network company shall adopt a policy prohibiting a driver, while providing transportation network company services, from the solicitation or acceptance of cash payments from riders and notify drivers of the policy.

While providing transportation network services, drivers shall not solicit or accept cash payments from riders.

Any payment for a prearranged ride shall be made only electronically using the transportation network center's digital network or software application.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-309. Nondiscrimination policy — Accomodation of service animals — Wheelchair accessible service.

The transportation network company shall adopt a policy of nondiscrimination with respect to passengers and potential passengers and notify transportation network company drivers of the policy.

Drivers shall comply with all applicable laws regarding nondiscrimination against passengers or potential passengers.

Drivers shall comply with all applicable laws relating to accommodation of service animals.

A transportation network company shall not impose additional charges for providing a prearranged ride to persons with physical disabilities because of those disabilities.

A transportation network company shall provide riders an opportunity to indicate whether they require a wheelchair-accessible vehicle. If a transportation network company cannot arrange wheelchair-accessible service in any instance, it shall direct the rider to an alternate provider of wheelchair-accessible service, if available.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-310. Information to be provided in event of accident.

If a motor vehicle accident occurs involving a motor vehicle that is being used to provide a prearranged ride, including when the driver is logged into or otherwise using the transportation network company's digital network, the transportation network company shall provide documentation, upon request by a law enforcement officer, that the driver was logged into the transportation network company's digital network at the time of the accident.

A transportation network company shall comply with any law enforcement investigation in which transportation network company trip data may be pertinent.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.

65-15-311. Suspected drug or alcohol use during course of trip.

If the transportation network company is informed through the complaint procedure as described in § 65-15-305(a) that a rider reasonably suspects that a driver was under the influence of drugs or alcohol during the course of a trip, the transportation network company shall instruct the rider who filed the complaint to also report the driver's suspected drug or alcohol use to a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over any criminal offense that may have occurred as a result of a driver being under the influence of drugs or alcohol. A transportation network company shall comply with any investigation by the local law enforcement agency.

Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Network Company Services Act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 520, § 5. May 20, 2015.